Utah statutes.
53A-1a-501.9.   State Charter School Board to request applications for certain types of charter schools.

(1)  To meet the unique learning styles and needs of students, the State Charter School Board shall seek to expand the types of instructional methods and programs offered by schools, as provided in this section.

(2) (a)  The State Charter School Board shall request individuals, groups of individuals, or not-for-profit legal entities to submit an application to the State Charter School Board to establish a charter school that employs new and creative methods to meet the unique learning styles and needs of students, such as:

(i)  a military charter school;

(ii)  a charter school whose mission is to enhance learning opportunities for students at risk of academic failure;

(iii)  a charter school whose focus is career and technical education;

(iv)  a single gender charter school; or

(v)  a charter school with an international focus that provides opportunities for the exchange of students or teachers.

(b)  In addition to a charter school identified in Subsection (2)(a), the State Charter School Board shall request applications for other types of charter schools that meet the unique learning styles and needs of students.

(3)  The State Charter School Board shall publicize a request for applications to establish a charter school specified in Subsection (2).

(4)  A charter school application submitted pursuant to Subsection (2) shall be subject to the application and approval procedures specified in Section 53A-1a-505.

(5)  The State Charter School Board and the State Board of Education may approve one or more applications for each charter school specified in Subsection (2), subject to the Legislature appropriating funds for, or authorizing, an increase in charter school enrollment capacity as provided in Section 53A-1a-502.5.

(6)  The State Board of Education shall submit a request to the Legislature to appropriate funds for, or authorize, the enrollment of students in charter schools tentatively approved under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 376, 2013 General Session

